Florida, session 2026, HB331.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Paragraph (b) of subsection (1) of section
1003.42, Florida Statutes, is amended to read:
1003.42 Required instruction.—
(1)
(b) All materials used to teach reproductive health or any
disease, including HIV/AIDS, its symptoms, development, and
treatment, as part of the courses referenced in subsection (5),
must be annually approved by the district school board in an
open, noticed public meeting department.
Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 1 of 1
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb331-00